Vermont statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Subchapter 4. Miscellaneous Provisions

§ 1095.
Application and construction.

In applying and construing this chapter, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 29

, § 1.

§ 1096.
Effective date and transitional provision.

This chapter shall take effect July 1, 2011. A motion or other request for relief made in a child custody proceeding or to enforce a child custody determination which was commenced before the effective date of this chapter is governed by the law in effect at the time the motion or other request was made.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 29

, § 1.